nb: Pasjonsfruktvariant: Svart; Kjempegranadilla; Gyllen; Granadilla; Panama-gul; Lilla; Rød; Søt granadilla; Gul; Annet
hr-HR: Sorta marakuje: Crna; Divovska granadilja; Zlatna; Granadilja; Panamska žuta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Slatka granadilja; Žuta; Ostalo
hu: Marakujafajta: Fekete; Óriás granadilla; Arany; Granadilla; Panamai sárga; Lila; Piros; Édes granadilla; Sárga; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία φρούτων του πάθους: Μαύρο; Γιγάντια γραναδίλλα; Χρυσό; Γραναδίλλα; Κίτρινο Παναμά; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Γλυκιά γραναδίλλα; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
fi: Passionhedelmän lajike: Musta; Jättigranadilla; Kultainen; Granadilla; Panamankeltainen; Violetti; Punainen; Makeagranadilla; Keltainen; Muu
en: Passion fruit variety: Black; Giant granadilla; Golden; Granadilla; Panama yellow; Purple; Red; Sweet granadilla; Yellow; Other
ja: パッションフルーツの種類: 黒; オオミトケイソウ; ゴールデン; グラナディラ; パナマイエロー; 紫; 赤; スイートグラナディラ; 黄色; その他
zh-CN: 百香果品种: 黑色; 大果西番莲; 金色; 甜西番莲; 巴拿马黄; 紫色; 红色; 甜西番莲; 黄色; 其他
zh-TW: 百香果品種: 黑色; 大果西番蓮; 金色; 西番蓮; 巴拿馬黃色; 紫色; 紅色; 甜西番蓮; 黃色; 其他
cs: Odrůda mučenky: Černá; Mučenka obří; Zlatá; Granadilla; Panamská žlutá; Purpurová; Červená; Sladká granadilla; Žlutá; Ostatní
it: Varietà di frutto della passione: Nero; Granadilla gigante; Dorato; Granadilla; Giallo di Panama; Viola; Rosso; Granadilla dolce; Giallo; Altro
ro-RO: Soi de fructul pasiunii: Negru; Granadilla uriașă; Auriu; Granadilla; Galben de Panama; Mov; Roșu; Granadilla dulce; Galben; Altele
lt-LT: Pasiflorų veislė: Juodoji; Didžioji granadilė; Auksinė; Granadilė; Panamos geltonoji; Violetinė; Raudonoji; Saldžioji granadilė; Geltonoji; Kita
vi: Giống chanh dây: Đen; Chanh dây khổng lồ; Vàng; Granadilla; Vàng Panama; Tím; Đỏ; Chanh dây ngọt; Vàng; Khác
sv: Passionsfruktsort: Svart; Jättegranadilla; Gyllene; Granadilla; Gul panama; Lila; Röd; Söt granadilla; Gul; Övrigt
pl: Odmiana marakui: Czarna; Męczennica olbrzymia; Złota; Granadilla; Panama Yellow; Fioletowa; Czerwona; Słodka granadilla; Żółta; Inne
de: Passionsfruchtsorte: Schwarz; Riesengranadilla; Golden; Granadilla; Panama Gelb; Lila; Rot; Süße Granadilla; Gelb; Sonstige
nl: Passievrucht variëteit: Zwart; Reuzengranadilla; Goud; Granadilla; Panamageel; Paars; Rood; Zoete granadilla; Geel; Overig
bg-BG: Сорт маракуя: Черна; Гигантска гранадила; Златна; Гранадила; Панамска жълта; Лилава; Червена; Сладка гранадила; Жълта; Друго
pt-PT: Variedade de maracujá: Preto; Maracujá-açu; Dourado; Granadilha; Amarelo panamá; Roxo; Vermelho; Maracujá-doce; Amarelo; Outro
sk-SK: Odroda mučenky: Čierna; Mučenka obrovská; Zlatá; Mučenka jazykovitá (granadilla); Žltá panamská; Fialová; Červená; Sladká granadilla; Žltá; Iné
es: Variedad de fruta de la pasión: Negro; Granadilla gigante; Dorado; Granadilla; Amarillo panamá; Morado; Rojo; Granadilla dulce; Amarillo; Otro
pt-BR: Variedade de maracujá: Preto; Maracujá-açu; Dourado; Granadilha; Amarelo do Panamá; Roxo; Vermelho; Granadilha doce; Amarelo; Outro
da: Passionsfrugtsort: Sort; Kæmpegranadilla; Gylden; Granadilla; Panama-gul; Lilla; Rød; Sød granadilla; Gul; Andet
ru: Сорт маракуйи: Черный; Гигантская гранадилла; Золотой; Гранадилла; Панамский желтый; Пурпурный; Красный; Сладкая гранадилла; Желтый; Другое
fr: Variété de fruit de la passion: Noir; Grenadille géante; Doré; Grenadille; Jaune du Panama; Violet; Rouge; Grenadille douce; Jaune; Autre
tr: Çarkıfelek meyvesi çeşidi: Siyah; Dev granadilla; Altın; Granadilla; Panama sarısı; Mor; Kırmızı; Tatlı granadilla; Sarı; Diğer
th: เสาวรสหลากหลายสายพันธุ์: สีดำ; เสาวรสยักษ์; สีทอง; กรานาดิลลา; สีเหลืองปานามา; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สวีทกรานาดิลลา; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Sorta pasijonke: Črna; Velika granadilja; Zlata; Granadilja; Rumena Panama; Vijolična; Rdeča; Sladka granadilja; Rumena; Drugo
ko: 패션프루트 품종: 검정색; 자이언트 그라나딜라; 골든; 그라나딜라; 파나마 옐로우; 보라색; 빨간색; 스위트 그라나딜라; 노란색; 기타